Utah statutes.
48-1-40 (Repealed 07/01/13).   Accrual of actions.

The right to an account of his interest shall accrue to any partner or his legal representative as against the winding-up partners or the surviving partners or the person or partnership continuing the business, at the date of dissolution in the absence of any agreement to the contrary. 



No Change Since 1953 

Repealed by Chapter 353, 2011 General Session

